District of Columbia statutes.
32-409

Protection of privacy.

An employment agency, employment counseling service, employer-paid personnel service, or employment counselor shall obtain the express written authorization of a job-seeker before disclosing the job-seeker’s name, home address, or telephone number to any person other than to the Mayor or his or her duly authorized representative for the purpose of conducting an investigation pursuant to § 32-410.

Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-136, § 10, 31 DCR 5727
1981 Ed., § 36-1009.